Massachusetts, session 194th, H2060.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13A of Chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the
following subsection:-
(b) Whoever commits an assault or an assault and battery:
(i) upon another and by such assault and battery causes serious bodily injury;
(ii) upon another who is pregnant at the time of such assault and battery, knowing or
having reason to know that the person is pregnant;
of 2

(iii) upon another who he knows has an outstanding temporary or permanent vacate,
restraining or no contact order or judgment issued pursuant to section 18, section 34B or 34C of
chapter 208, section 32 of chapter 209, section 3, 4, or 5 of chapter 209A, or section 15 or 20 of
chapter 209C, in effect against him at the time of such assault or assault and battery;
(iv) upon a person who is classified within Group 4 of subdivision 2 of paragraph (g)
section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws by virtue of their employment, while such person is
actively engaged in the performance of their official duties;
(v) upon a person who is a teacher, school librarian, school adjustment counselor, school
nurse, school social worker or school psychologist in any public school, while such person is
actively engaged in the performance of their official duties;
(vi) upon a person who is a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, while such person
is actively engaged in the performance of their official duties;
(vii) upon a person serving as a referee or other official of a school athletic event, while
such person is actively engaged in the performance of their official duties; or
(viii) upon a police dog, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111C, while such animal is
actively engaged in the performance of their official duties;
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 5 years or in the
house of correction for not more than 21/2 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
such fine and imprisonment.
of 2